Utah statutes.
13-45-204.   Fees for security freeze.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a consumer reporting agency may charge a reasonable fee to a consumer for placing and temporarily removing a security freeze.

(2)  A consumer reporting agency may not charge a fee for placing or removing a security freeze if:

(a)  the consumer is a victim of identity fraud under Section 76-6-1102; and

(b)  the consumer provides the consumer reporting agency with a valid copy of a police report or police case number documenting the identity fraud.



Enacted by Chapter 344, 2006 General Session

